Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2408
Combined improvements; legislative intent.

The Legislature finds that it is advantageous to cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and villages and to the inhabitants thereof to authorize such cities and villages to make various street improvements and install water mains and sewer lines as a single project when the aggregate cost of the individual improvement does not exceed fifty thousand dollars and the aggregate cost of all improvements in a single project does not exceed two hundred thousand dollars, in lieu of the cities and villages making such improvements as separate projects.

Laws 1961, c. 64, § 1, p. 252;

Laws 2003, LB 52, § 2.